District of Columbia statutes.
38-2553

Special Education Reform Plan.

The Superintendent of Schools shall develop a Special Education Reform Plan (“Reform Plan”) which shall include the following:

(1)

Measurable goals;

(2)

Timelines for deliverables;

(3)

Roles and responsibilities of all District agencies that provide special education related services;

(4)

Proposed legislative initiatives;

(5)

Targeted savings activities for fiscal years 2003 through 2005; and

(6)

Continued review and input from Task Force members.

Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 374, 50 DCR 5668
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of Special Education Task Force Establishment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-232, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10729).
This section is referenced in § 38-2552.